Hawaii statutes.
§490:8-303 Protected purchaser. (a)
"Protected purchaser" means a purchaser of a certificated or
uncertificated security, or of an interest therein, who:

(1) Gives value;

(2) Does not have notice of any adverse claim to the
security; and

(3) Obtains control of the certificated or
uncertificated security.

(b) In addition to acquiring the rights of a
purchaser, a protected purchaser also acquires its interest in the security
free of any adverse claim. [L 1997, c 33, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next